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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A442F)

DI3R5-01

DTC [P0753/62,P0758/63 | Shift Solenoid A/B Electrical Malfunc-
tion (No. 1/No.2 Solenoid valve)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Shiftingfrom 1stto O/Dis performedin combination with ON and OFF ofthe No. 1 andNo.2solenoid valves
controlledby EngineandECTECU (2UZ  -FE, 1FZ-FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE).Ifanopen
orshortcircuitoccursin either ofthe solenoid valves, the Engineand ECT ECU (2UZ -FE, 1FZ-FE) orECT

ECU ( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE) controls the remaining normal solenoid valve to allow the vehicle to be oper-
ated smoothly (Fail safe function).

HINT:

ChecktheNo. 1 solenoidvalve when DTC P0753/62is output, checkthe No.2 solenoid valve when DTC
P0758/63 is output.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

The Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU checks for an open or
shortcircuitintheNo. 1 orNo.2solenoid valve circuitwhenit
changes.

The Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU records DTC
P0753/62 or P0758/63 if condition (a) or (b) is detected once,
but it does not light up O/D OFF indicator light.

After Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU detects condition (a)
or (b) continuously 8times ormorein 1 trip, itcauses the O/D *OpenorshortinNo. 1/No.2solenoid valve circuit

P0753/62 OFF indicator light lights up until condition (a) or (b) disap- *No.1/No.2solenoid valve

P0758/63 pears. *EngineandECTECU (2UZ -FE, 1FZ-FE)
Afterthat, iftthe Engineand ECT ECU or ECT ECU detects *ECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE)
condition (a) or (b) once, it starts lighting up O/D OFF indicator
light again.

(a) Solenoidresistanceis8 Q orless (shortcircuit) whenthe
solenoid is energized.

(b) Solenoidresistanceis 100k Q ormore (open circuit) when
the solenoid is not energized.

Fail Safe Function:

If either of the shift solenoid valve circuits develops an open or short, the Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU
turns the other solenoid valve ON and OFF to shift to the gear positions shown in the table below. The Engine
and ECT ECU or ECT ECU also turns the SL solenoid valve OFF at the same time. If both solenoids are
malfunctioning, hydraulic control cannot be performed electronically and must be done manually.

Manual shifting as shown in the following table must be done (In the case of a short circuit, the Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU stops sending current to the short circuited solenoid).
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NORMAL NO.1 SOLENOID NO.2 SOLENOID BOTH SOLENOIDS MAL-
R MALFUNCTIONING MALFUNCTIONING FUNCTIONING
ange Solenoid valve Gear Solenoid valve Gear Solenoid valve Gear Gear when shift selector is
No.1 No.2 No.1 No.2 No.1 No.2 manually operated
ON OFF 1st X OFF 3rd ON X 1st o/D
5 ON ON 2nd X ON 3rd OFF X O/D o/D
OFF ON 3rd X ON 3rd OFF X O/D Oo/D
OFF OFF O/D X QFF O/D DFF X 0O/D O/D
ON OFF 1st X OFF 3rd ON X 1st 3rd
2 ON ON 2nd X ON 3rd OFF X 3rd 3rd
OFF ON 3rd X ON 3rd OFF X 3rd 3rd
ON OFF 1st X OFF 1st ON X 1st 1st
L
ONON 2nd ON 2nd anN K st 1st
X: Malfunctions
WIRING DIAGRAM
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1FZ-FE
Transmission Engine and ECT ECU
)
S1 Solenoid Valve
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to Cruise Control
ECU
1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE
Transmission ECT ECU
)
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S2 Solenoid valve

8 9 5 9 1 22
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*1: {HD-FTE
*2: 1HZ, 1HD-T
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D03966

D03978
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

ECU and body ground.

1 Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT
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D03254

PREPARATION:

D03311

@
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(@) Remove the glove compartment door
(See page BO-127).
Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 -15Q at20 °C (68 °F)

(b)

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN-35).
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2 [ Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and
automatic transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the solenoid connector from the automatic trans-
mission.

CHECK:

Check the harness and connector between terminal S1 or, S2
of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and terminal S1 or S2 of
solenoid connector.

OK:

1FZ-FE There is no open and no short circuit.

1HD-FTE
L@
I i szi
II/IIUI_IJ [TTTTTT L) !

S1

D01666
D03294
Q11269
D03255
D02928 D03312
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OK

Repair or replace the harness or connector.

o )

3 Check No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

D03256

OK

Electrical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between solenoid connector and
body ground.

(b) Connect positive @ lead to terminal of solenoid connec-
tor, negative © lead to solenoid body.

OK:
(a) Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20 °C (68 °F)
(b) The solenoid makes an operating noise.

Mechanical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

CHECK:

(@) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/lcm?2, 71 psi) of compressed air,
check that the solenoid valves do not leak air.

(b) When battery positive voltage is supplied to the solenoid
valves, check that the solenoid valves open.

OK:
(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air.
(b) Solenoid valve opens.

o)

Replace the solenoid valve.

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.
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